Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2557XS (3) 91 dg/ko S.F. 329 Section 1. Section 232.2, subsection 12, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) All rights and duties of a custodian shall be 3 subject to any residual rights and duties remaining in a parent 4 or guardian. 5 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may 6 consent to emergency medical care and routine medical care for 7 a child that will allow the child to experience childhood and 8 participate in activities in a manner similar to the childâs 9 peers. âRoutine medical careâ includes but is not limited to 10 all of the following: 11 (a) A sports physical performed by a licensed health care 12 provider. 13 (b) A medically necessary blood test performed by a licensed 14 health care provider. 15 (c) The use of a medically necessary antibiotic prescribed 16 by a licensed health care provider. 17 (3) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department 18 may consent to a childâs participation in an individualized 19 education program. 20 Sec. 2. Section 232.2, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended 21 by adding the following new paragraph: 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If a court order entered under this 23 chapter transfers legal custody of a child to the department, 24 the department shall have the authority to delegate the 25 departmentâs rights and duties as custodian of the child to a 26 licensee under chapter 237. 27 Sec. 3. Section 237.10, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 28 by adding the following new paragraph: 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) The department shall notify 30 an individual licensee if the department delegates the 31 departmentâs right to consent to emergency medical care and 32 routine medical care on behalf of a child under section 232.2, 33 paragraph âcâ , to the individual licensee. 34 (2) The department shall notify the department of education 35 -1- LSB 2557XS (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 329 and an individual licensee if the department delegates 1 the departmentâs right to consent to participation in an 2 individualized education program on behalf of a child under 3 section 232.2, paragraph âcâ , to the individual licensee. 4